South Dakota, session 2026, SB152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 23A-3:
When a law enforcement officer arrests any person who is a member of, or
otherwise associated with, the armed forces of the United States, the officer must
determine whether a military protective order registered in the Federal Bureau of
Investigation's National Crime Information Center database has been issued against the
person. If the officer has probable cause to believe the person has violated the military
protective order, the officer must notify the authority that issued the military protective
order.
For purposes of this section, "military protective order" has the same meaning as
in 32 C.F.R. § 635.19 (January 23, 2026).
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 25-10:
In any proceeding under this chapter, a military protective order, as defined in 32
C.F.R. § 635.19 (January 23, 2026), may be admitted as evidence in order to establish a
relevant pattern or course of conduct of the respondent.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.